Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-7304
Applicability of act.

Except as otherwise specified, the Health Carrier Grievance Procedure Act applies to all health carriers that offer managed care plans.

Laws 1998, LB 1162, § 69.